Vermont, session 2025-2026, S164.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 631 is amended to read:
§ 631. GROUP INSURANCE FOR STATE EMPLOYEES; SALARY
DEDUCTIONS FOR INSURANCE, SAVINGS PLANS, AND
CREDIT UNIONS
(a)(1) The Secretary of Administration may contract on behalf of the State
with any insurance company or nonprofit association doing business in this
State to secure the benefits of franchise or group insurance. The terms of
coverage under the policy shall be determined under section 904 of this title,
but it may include:
VT LEG #385455 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.164
2026 Page 2 of 3
* * *
(2)(A)(i) As used in this section, the term “employees” includes any
class or classes of elected or appointed officials, State’s Attorneys, sheriffs,
employees of State’s Attorneys’ offices whose compensation is administered
through the State of Vermont payroll system, except contractual and temporary
employees, and deputy sheriffs paid by the State of Vermont pursuant to 24
V.S.A. § 290(b). The term “employees” shall does not include members of the
General Assembly as such, any person rendering service on a retainer or fee
basis, members of boards or commissions, or persons other than employees of
the Vermont Historical Society, the Vermont Film Corporation, the Vermont
State Employees’ Credit Union, Vermont State Employees’ Association, and
the Vermont Council on the Arts, whose compensation for service is not paid
from the State Treasury, or any elected or appointed official unless the except
as specifically provided pursuant to this subdivision (a)(2)(A)(i). The term
“employees” includes employees of the Vermont Historical Society, the
Vermont State Employees’ Credit Union, the Vermont State Employees’
Association, the Vermont Council on the Arts, and any elected or appointed
official who is actively engaged in and devoting substantially full-time to the
conduct of the business of the official’s public office. The term “employees”
also includes members of the General Assembly as set forth in subdivision (iv)
of this subdivision (a)(2)(A).
VT LEG #385455 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.164
2026 Page 3 of 3
* * *
(iv) For purposes of group hospital-surgical-medical expense
insurance, any employee assistance program offered to State employees, and
any flexible spending account program offered to State employees for health
care or dependent care expenses, or both, the term “employees” includes
members of the General Assembly.
(B)(i) The premiums for extending insurance coverage to employees
shall be paid in full by the Vermont Historical Society, the Vermont Film
Corporation, the Vermont State Employees’ Association, the Vermont State
Employees’ Credit Union, the Vermont Council on the Arts, or their respective
retirees. Nothing herein creates a legal obligation on the part of the State of
Vermont to pay any portion of the premiums required to extend insurance
coverage to this group of employees.
(ii) Members of the General Assembly shall be required to pay the
same portion of the premium for group hospital-surgical-medical expense
insurance as is required of employees of the Executive Branch.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027, and shall apply to coverage
beginning on and after that date.
VT LEG #385455 v.1